orig/quantLexcErz.lexc
LEXICON Quants3_TLOSS
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:д 0:е %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Abl:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:н 0:ь %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Gen:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:н 0:е 0:н 0:ь %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Dat:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:с %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Ill:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:в 0:а %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Prol:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:в 0:т 0:е 0:м 0:е %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Abe:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:к 0:с 0:Ы3 %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Transl:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:с 0:э %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Ine:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:с 0:т 0:э %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Ela:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:ш 0:к 0:а %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Comp:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:в 0:а %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Prol:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Attributes2 ; 
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:в 0:т 0:е 0:м 0:е %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Abe:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Attributes2 ; 
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:к 0:с 0:Ы3 %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Transl:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Attributes2 ; 
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:с 0:э %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Ine:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Attributes2 ; 
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:с 0:т 0:э %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Ela:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Attributes2 ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:ш 0:к 0:а %+Det:0 %+Pl:0 %+Comp:0 "@C.TLOSS@"> Attributes2 ; 


LEXICON Attributes1
 Attributes2 ;
+Indet+Nom+Pl:^тУ4  Tenses1 ;
+Indet+Ela:^стО1 Clitics ;
+Indet+Transl:^кс Clitics ;
+Indet+Nom+Sg: Clitics ;


LEXICON Attributes2
+Noun2+NoVowX+Det+Sg+Nom:^сь Tenses1 ;
+Noun2+VowX+Det+Sg+Nom:^V1сь Tenses1 ;
+Noun2+NoVowX+Det+Sg+Gen:^нть Clitics ;
+Noun2+NoVowX+Det+Sg+Dat:^нтень Clitics ;
+Noun2+VowX+Det+Sg+Gen:^V1нть Clitics ;
+Noun2+VowX+Det+Sg+Dat:^V1нтень Clitics ;
+Noun2+Indet+Pl:^тУ4 Tenses1 ;
+Noun2+Det+Pl:^тне Tenses1 ;
+Noun2+NoVowX+Gen:^нь Tenses1 ;
+Noun2+VowX+Gen:^V1нь Tenses1 ;
+Noun2+Prol+Det+Sg:^Г2а^нть Clitics ;
+Noun2+Abe+Det+Sg:^втО1мО1^нть Clitics ;
+Noun2+Abl+Det+Sg:^дО1^нть Clitics ;
+Noun2+NoVowX+Transl+Det+Sg:^ксУ4^нть Clitics ;
+Noun2+NoVowX+Ine+Det+Sg:^сО1^нть Clitics ;
+Noun2+NoVowX+Ela+Det+Sg:^стО1^нть Clitics ;
+Noun2+NoVowX+Comp+Det+Sg:^шка^нть Clitics ;
+Noun2+VowX+Transl+Det+Sg:^V1ксУ4^нть Clitics ;
+Noun2+VowX+Ine+Det+Sg:^V1сО1^нть Clitics ;
+Noun2+VowX+Ela+Det+Sg:^V1стО1^нть Clitics ;
+Noun2+VowX+Comp+Det+Sg:^V1шка^нть Clitics ;
+Noun2+Det+Pl+Abl:^тне^де Clitics ;
+Noun2+Det+Pl+Gen:^тне^нь Clitics ;
+Noun2+Det+Pl+Dat:^тне^нень Clitics ;
+Noun2+Det+Pl+Ill:^тне^с Clitics ;
+Noun2+Det+Pl+Prol:^тне^ва Tenses1 ;
+Noun2+Det+Pl+Abe:^тне^втеме Tenses1 ;
+Noun2+Det+Pl+Transl:^тне^кс Clitics ;
+Noun2+Det+Pl+Ine:^тне^сэ Tenses1 ;
+Noun2+Det+Pl+Ela:^тне^стэ Tenses1 ;
+Noun2+Det+Pl+Comp:^тне^шка Tenses1 ;




LEXICON Possessives1
+NoPossPx: Tenses1 ;
 Possessives2 ;

LEXICON Possessives2-Ill
 Possessives2 ;
+NoVowX+Ill:^зО1 Possessives2 ;


LEXICON Possessives2
+NoVowX+Poss+1Sgm:^м Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+Poss+1SgN:^нУ4 Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+Poss+2Sg:^тУ4 Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+Poss+3Sg+NonNomSg:^нзО1 Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+Poss+3Sg+Nom+Sg:^зО1 Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+Poss+1Pl:^нО1к Tenses1 ;
+NoVowX+Poss+2Pl:^нк Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:с 0:т %+NoVowX:0 %+Poss:0 %+3Pl:0 "@P.TLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:с 0:к %+NoVowX:0 %+Poss:0 %+3Pl:0 "@P.TLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:с 0:к 0:е %+NoVowX:0 %+Poss:0 %+3Pl:0 "@P.TLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;

+VowX+Poss+1Sgm:^V1м Tenses1 ;
+VowX+Poss+1SgN:^V1нУ4 Tenses1 ;
+VowX+Poss+2Sg:^V1тУ4 Tenses1 ;
+VowX+Poss+3Sg+NonNomSg:^V1нзО1 Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:V1 0:н 0:О1 0:к %+VowX:0 %+Poss:0 %+1Pl:0 "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:V1 0:н 0:к %+VowX:0 %+Poss:0 %+2Pl:0 "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;
< 0:%^ 0:V1 0:с 0:т %+VowX:0 %+Poss:0 %+3Pl:0 "@P.TLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;




LEXICON Tenses1
+NoPredx: Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+1Sg:^А2н Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+2Sg:^А2т Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+1Pl:^тА2но Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+2Pl:^тА2до Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Pred+PretII+1Sg:^линь Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Pred+PretII+2Sg:^лить Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Pred+PretII+3Sg:^ль Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к %+NoVowX:0 %+Pred:0 %+PretII:0 %+1Pl:0  "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Pred+PretII+2Pl:^лиде Clitics ;
+NoVowX+Pred+PretII+3Pl:^льть Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:А2 0:н 0:о %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+1Pl:0 "@R.TLOSS.ON@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:А2 0:д 0:о %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+2Pl:0 "@R.TLOSS.ON@"> Clitics ;

+VowX+Pred+PretII+1Sg:^V1линь Clitics ;
+VowX+Pred+PretII+2Sg:^V1лить Clitics ;
+VowX+Pred+PretII+3Sg:^V1ль Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:V1 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к %+VowX:0 %+Pred:0 %+PretII:0 %+1Pl:0 "@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Clitics ;
+VowX+Pred+PretII+2Pl:^V1лиде Clitics ;
+VowX+Pred+PretII+3Pl:^V1льть Clitics ;

LEXICON Clitics
< 0:%^ 0:а 0:к %+KLoss:0 "@R.KLOSS.ON@"> # ;
+Clit:^Г1ак # ;
+NoClitic: # ;



END



"@C.KLOSS@"
"@C.TLOSS@"

LEXICON Root
весеме+Q:весеме Possessives2-Ill ;
кавонек+Num+Coll:кавоне Possessives2-Ill ;
весть+Num+Multip+NConsStem:весть Clitics ;
весть+Num+Multip+LV+Approx:вестешка Clitics ;
кавксть+Num+Multip+NConsStem:кавксть Clitics ;
кавксть+Num+Multip+LV+Approx+Multip:кавкстешкаксть Clitics ;
